Louisiana, session 2026, SB207.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of Code of Criminal Procedure Arts. 572(A)
and 573 are hereby amended and reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 571.2 is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 571.2. Time limitation for certain offenses committed by elected officials or
public employees
Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 572, the time limitation for the
institution of prosecution of an elected official or a public employee for the
following offenses when the offense was committed during the official's term in
office or the public employee's period of public employment shall be ten years
after the official's term of office during which the offense was committed ends
or the official otherwise leaves or vacates the office, whichever is sooner, or ten
years after the public employee's employment during which the offense was
committed terminates:
(1) Abuse of office, R.S. 14:134.3.
(2) Bribery of a candidate, R.S. 18:1469.
(3) Bribery of voters, R.S. 18:1461.
(4) Corrupt influencing, R.S. 14:120.
(5) Malfeasance in office, R.S. 14:134.
(6) Public bribery, R.S. 14:118.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 207 ENROLLED
Art. 572. Limitation of prosecution of noncapital offenses
A. Except as provided in Articles 571 and , 571.1, or 571.2, no person shall
be prosecuted, tried, or punished for an offense not punishable by death or life
imprisonment, unless the prosecution is instituted within the following periods of
time after the offense has been committed:
* * *
Art. 573. Running of time limitations; exception
The time limitations established by Article 572 shall not commence to run
as to the following offenses until the relationship or status involved has ceased to
exist when:
(1) The Except as provided in Article 571.2, the offense charged is based
on the misappropriation of any money or thing of value by one who, by virtue of his
office, employment, or fiduciary relationship, has been entrusted therewith or has
control thereof.
(2) The offense charged is extortion (R.S. 14:66) or false accounting (R.S.
14:70) committed by a public officer or employee in his official capacity.
(3) The offense charged is public bribery.
(4) The offense charged is a felony crime of violence as defined in R.S.
14:2(B) or cruelty to juveniles as defined in R.S. 14:93 and the victim is under
eighteen years of age, unless a longer period of limitation is established by Article
571.1 or any other provision of law.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.